Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8018.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-27.3-120.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled "State
Building Code" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-120.1. New buildings.
(a) No building or structure hereafter erected shall be used or occupied in whole or in part
until a certificate of use and occupancy shall have been issued by the building official. The
certificate shall not be issued until all work has been completed in accordance with the provisions
of this code, the Fire Safety Code (chapters 28.1 — 28.39 of this title), of all approved permits, and
of all applicable codes for which a permit is required, except as provided in § 23-27.3-120.4. In
addition, the certificate shall not be issued for any property serviced by a private well until the
property owner has submitted documentation to the building official which demonstrates
compliance with the drinking water testing requirements and the drinking water standard for
coliform bacteria, fluoride, lead, nitrate and nitrite for private wells established by the director of
health. A city or town may require additional testing and compliance with quality standards
established pursuant to § 23-1-5.3(6).
(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, approval of new residential
construction shall require at a minimum, two (2) means of egress consisting of standard exterior
doors.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005558
========
LC005558 - Page 2 of 3